California, session 20252026, AB2513.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) Wildfires pose an ongoing and increasing threat to life, property, public health, and the state’s economy.(2) Over the past decade, California has recognized that wildfire behavior varies widely across the state with winds being the predominant driver of wildfires in the southern part of the state and fuels being the predominant driver of wildfires in the northern part of the state.(3) Southern California’s shrubland and chapparal landscapes require different approaches to reduce the threat of wildfire that do not align with the needs in forested landscapes.(4) Led by the Wildfire and Forest Resilience Task Force and supported by the Regional Forest and Fire Capacity Program administered by the Department of Conservation, local capacity has grown, and regions are developing strategies and projects that respond to these differing contexts and fire regimes.(5) The Wildlife Conversation Board is dedicated to safeguarding California’s spectacular biological diversity and wild spaces for the benefit of present and future generations. The Wildlife Conversation Board achieves this goals, in part, through the issuance of grants for restoration purposes that fund projects that provide wildfire resilience benefits and in turn protect California’s wild spaces and biological diversity.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to match funding levels to the scale of the problem, and the scale of regionally developed plans and projects.SEC. 2. Section 1357 is added to the Fish and Game Code, to read:1357. (a) The board may award regional landscape grants to regional entities to implement regional priority strategies developed pursuant to Section 4208.1 of the Public Resources Code.(b) Before the issuance of regional landscape grants pursuant to subdivision (a), the board, in collaboration with the Wildfire and Forest Resilience Task Force, shall establish guidelines for funding regional landscape grants pursuant to subdivision (a) to contribute to the achievement of the goals of California’s Wildfire and Forest Resilience Action Plan issued in January 2021, and any subsequent updates to that plan developed pursuant to Section 4771 of the Public Resources Code. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to the development and adoption of guidelines used for funding these grants.(c) For purposes of this section, “regional entities” has the same meaning as defined in Section 4208 of the Public Resources Code.SEC. 3. Section 4124 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:4124. For purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:(a) “Fire prevention activities” means those lawful activities that reduce the risk of wildfire in California, including, but not limited to, mechanical and manual vegetation management and modification, prescribed grazing, prescribed burns, creation of defensible space, creation of fuel breaks, ignition prevention, replacement of ignition-prone nonnative fuels or flashy fuels with heavier and less flammable native vegetation, technologies that improve detection and assessment of new fire ignitions, and retrofitting of structures to increase fire resistance.(b) “Flashy fuels” means shrubs, grasses, and foliage, including, but not limited to, pine needles and leaves, that dry or cure rapidly, ignite easily, and spread fire quickly. (b)(c) “Ignition prevention” means those lawful activities that reduce the likelihood of wildfire ignitions caused directly or indirectly by human activity or infrastructure, including replacement or modification of ignition-prone nonnative fuels or flashy fuels to with less flammable native vegetation, hardening of infrastructure, including primary roadways, utility corridors, and public access points, to prevent fire ignition and spread, use of ignition-resistant materials, and community education or planning programs that reduce human-caused ignitions.(c)(d) “Nonnative flashy fuels” means a nonnative or invasive plant species species, including grasses, mustard, shrubs, and other annual plants, and pine needles and leaves, that dry or cure rapidly, ignite easily, and spread fire quickly, significantly increasing wildfire risk. nonnative or invasive woody plant species. SEC. 4. Section 4124.5 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:4124.5. (a) The department shall establish a local assistance grant program for fire prevention and home hardening education activities in California. Groups eligible for grants shall include, but are not limited to, local agencies, resource conservation districts, fire safe councils, the California Conservation Corps, certified community conservation corps as defined in Section 14507.5, University of California Cooperative Extension, the Board of Commissioners under CaliforniaVolunteers described in Section 8411 of the Government Code, Native American tribes, and qualified nonprofit organizations. The department may establish a cost-share requirement for one or more categories of projects.(b) (1) The local assistance grant program shall establish a robust year-round fire prevention effort in and near fire-threatened communities that focuses on increasing the protection of people, structures, and communities. To the maximum extent practicable, the grants shall be designed to be durable and adaptively managed so that while improving resiliency to wildfire, the projects, when on forest land, retain a mixture of species and sizes of trees to protect habitat values. The department shall prioritize, to the extent feasible, projects that are multiyear efforts.(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “fire-threatened communities” means those communities in high and very high fire hazard severity zones, identified by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code, or Article 9 (commencing with Section 4201) of this code, or on the “Fire Risk Reduction Community” list maintained by the board pursuant to Section 4290.1.(c) Eligible activities shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(1) Development and implementation of public education and outreach programs. Programs may include technical assistance, new technologies, game elements to enhance and accelerate the education of property owners, workforce recruitment and training, and equipment purchases.(2) Fire prevention activities.(3) Projects to improve compliance with defensible space requirements as required by Section 4291 through increased inspections, assessments, and assistance for residents with relevant socioeconomic characteristics, as defined in Section 8654.7 of the Government Code.(4) Technical assistance to local agencies to improve fire prevention and reduce fire hazards.(5) Creation of additional “Firewise USA” communities in the state or other community planning or certification programs deemed as appropriate by the department.(6) Projects to improve public safety, including, but not limited to, access to emergency equipment and improvements to public evacuation routes.(7) Vegetation management and modification along roadways and driveways to reduce fire risk, including wildfire ignition risk. Where appropriate, the Department of Transportation shall be consulted if state infrastructure will be affected. Those projects shall remain consistent with paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).(8) Public education outreach regarding making homes and communities more wildfire resilient, including training on defensible space and prescribed grazing.(9) Projects to reduce the flammability of structures and communities to prevent their ignition from wind-driven embers.(10) Development of a risk reduction checklist for communities that includes defensible space criteria, structural vulnerability potential, and personal evacuation plans.(11) (A) Projects involving the application of prescribed grazing, which may include the installation of fencing or watering improvements.(B) Watering improvements described in subparagraph (A) shall not include the creation of a well or replacement of well infrastructure.(12) Ignition prevention activities.(d) The department may consider the fire risk of an area, the geographic balance of projects, and whether the project is complementary to other fire prevention or forest health activities when awarding local assistance grants.(e) When reviewing applications for the grant program created pursuant to this section, the department shall give priority to any local governmental entity qualified to perform defensible space assessments pursuant to Section 4291.5 in very high and high fire hazard severity zones, as identified by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code or Article 9 (commencing with Section 4201) of this chapter or by a local agency pursuant to Section 51179 of the Government Code, for using the common reporting platform created pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 4291.5 to report that information.(f) (1) The director may authorize advance payments from a grant awarded pursuant to this section. The advance payment shall not exceed 25 percent of the total grant award. The director may authorize a greater amount, not to exceed 50 percent of either the total grant award or the cost of equipment or supplies, whichever amount is less, for the purpose of purchasing necessary equipment or supplies.(2) The grantee shall expend the funds from the advance payment within six months of receipt, unless the department waives this requirement.(3) The grantee shall file an accountability report with the department no later than six months from the date of receiving the funds and no later than every six months thereafter.(g) Until July 1, 2025, the department may authorize advance payments on a grant awarded under this section in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 11019.1 of the Government Code.(h) The department may expand or amend an existing grant program to meet the requirements of this section.(i) Funding for the local assistance grant program created pursuant to this section shall be made upon appropriation by the Legislature.SEC. 5. Section 4208 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:4208. For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:(a) “Department” means the Department of Conservation.(b) “Director” means the Director of the Department of Conservation.(c) “Eligible coordinating organization” means a local government, tribal government, resource conservation district, joint powers authority, or nongovernmental organization with a history of providing technical assistance and demonstrated capacity to coordinate regional partners across the state.(d) “Program” means the Regional Forest and Fire Capacity Program.(e) “Regional entity” means a state conservancy, local government, tribal government, resource conservation district, joint powers authority, or nongovernmental organization with a history of implementing related projects, demonstrated capacity to work across regional partners, and ability to serve as fiscal administrators for the program.(f) “Statewide implementation” means identifying and supporting regional entities in every part of the state that contains or is adjacent to a very high or high fire hazard severity zone identified by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code or Article 9 (commencing with Section 4201).SEC. 6. Section 4208.1 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:4208.1. (a) There is hereby established in the department the Regional Forest and Fire Capacity Program to support regional leadership to build local and regional capacity and develop, prioritize, and implement strategies and projects that create fire-adapted communities and landscapes by improving ecosystem health, community wildfire preparedness, and fire resilience. For strategies and projects that seek to create fire-adapted communities, regional entities shall maximize risk reductions to people and property, especially in the most vulnerable communities.(b) (1) The department shall, upon an appropriation by the Legislature for these purposes, do both of the following:(A) (i) Provide block grants to regional entities to develop regional strategies that develop governance structures, identify wildfire risks, foster collaboration, and prioritize and implement projects within the region to achieve the goals of the program.(ii) Regional priority strategy development shall be in coordination with public landowners and other relevant forest and fire planning efforts in wildfire and forest resiliency planning.(B) Ensure, to the extent feasible, there are regional entities to cover every part of the state that contains or is adjacent to a very high or high fire hazard severity zone identified by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code or Article 9 (commencing with Section 4201).(2) Regional entities may implement program activities directly or provide subgrants or contracts, and collaborative planning efforts with local entities, including municipal governments, tribal governments, nongovernmental organizations, community organizations, fire safe councils, land trusts, resource conservation districts, joint power authorities, special districts, fire departments, residents, private and public forest landowners and managers, businesses, and others, to assist the regional entity in accomplishing all of the following objectives:(A) Develop regional priority strategies that develop and support fire-adapted communities and landscapes by improving forest health, watershed health, fire risk reduction, or fire resilience needed to achieve local, regional, or statewide public safety, climate resiliency, and ecosystem goals included in the “Agreement for Shared Stewardship of California’s Forest and Rangelands” and “California’s Wildfire and Forest Resilience Action Plan.”(B) Complete project development and permitting to generate implementation-ready projects that address regional landscape resilience and community fire protection priorities for funding consideration.(C) Implement forest management demonstration projects that showcase scalable models for management, funding, and achieving and quantifying multiple benefits.(D) Implement community fire preparedness demonstration projects that create durable risk reduction for structures and critical community infrastructure.(E) Develop outreach, education, and training as needed to facilitate and build capacity to implement this section.(F) Collect and assess data and information as needed to identify and map communities, infrastructure, forests, and watersheds at risk of, and vulnerable to, wildfire, in collaboration with appropriate state agencies, including, but not limited to, the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection.(c) The department shall, upon an appropriation by the Legislature for these purposes, provide block grants to eligible coordinating organizations under the program to support the statewide implementation of the program through coordination of and technical assistance to regional entities, as well as to support forest health and resilience efforts across regions and throughout the state.(d) To maximize the benefits of the program, the department shall do all of the following:(1) Facilitate peer-to-peer learning within and between regions to share information, experiences, and resources to build regional capacity.(2) Provide technical assistance to regions to enhance regional capacity and assist in the development and prioritization of projects.(3) Assist regions in identifying potential funding sources for regional priorities.(4) Encourage the development of local cost share opportunities.(5) Publish and update on the department’s internet website the following information related to implementation of the program:(A) A list of regional entities and eligible coordinating organizations funded by the program.(B) The outcomes of any block grant provided to a regional entity or eligible coordinating organization, including a summary of the benefits, such as the number of people and properties for which wildfire risk has been mitigated, ecosystem health benefits, or other measurements of progress towards state goals for public health and safety, climate resilience, and biodiversity, as applicable.(C) A description of progress towards ensuring there are regional entities to cover every part of the state that contains or is adjacent to a very high or high fire hazard severity zone identified by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to Section 51178 of the Government Code or Article 9 (commencing with Section 4201).(e) The department may authorize advance payments on a grant awarded under this section.SEC. 7. Section 4208.2 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:4208.2. (a) The director may directly award regional landscape grants to regional entities to implement regional priority strategies developed pursuant to Section 4208.1.(b) Before the issuance of regional landscape grants pursuant to subdivision (a), the director, in collaboration with the Wildfire and Forest Resilience Task Force, shall establish guidelines for funding regional landscape grants pursuant to subdivision (a) to contribute to the achievement of the goals of California’s Wildfire and Forest Resilience Action Plan issued in January 2021, and any subsequent updates to that plan developed pursuant to Section 4771. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to the development and adoption of guidelines used for funding these grants. SEC. 8. Section 4799.05 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:4799.05. (a) (1) The director may provide grants to, or enter into contracts or other cooperative agreements with, entities, including, but not limited to, private or nongovernmental entities, Native American tribes, or local, state, and federal public agencies, for the implementation and administration of projects and programs to improve forest or ecosystem health and reduce greenhouse gas emissions.(2) (A) The director may authorize advance payments to a nonprofit organization, a local agency, a special district, a private forest landowner, or a Native American tribe from a grant awarded pursuant to this section. No single advance payment shall exceed 25 percent of the total grant award.(B) (i) The grantee shall expend the funds from the advance payment within six months of receipt, unless the department waives this requirement.(ii) The grantee shall file an accountability report with the department four months from the date of receiving the funds and every four months thereafter.(C) (i) The department shall provide a report to the Legislature on or before January 1, 2023, on the outcome of the department’s use of advance payments.(ii) A report submitted pursuant to this subparagraph shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(iii) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under clause (i) is inoperative on January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.(b) Any project or program described in this section that is funded with moneys from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund, created pursuant to Section 16428.8 of the Government Code, shall comply with all statutory and program requirements applicable to the use of moneys from the fund.(c) Moneys appropriated to the department for landscape-scale projects shall be allocated as follows:(1) To subsidize the removal of small diameter material, especially surface fuels and ladder fuels, as well as dead trees, in order to help develop markets for beneficial uses of the material, including, but not limited to, animal bedding, biochar, cross-laminated timber, mulch, oriented strand board, pulp, post, shredding, and veneer products.(2) For multiple benefit projects, such as tree thinning, carbon sequestration, forest resilience, and improved ecological outcome projects, including, but not limited to, restoring watershed health and function and supporting biodiversity and wildlife adaptation to climate change. The department shall give grant funding priority to landowners who practice uneven aged forest management with a resilient forest of diverse age, size, and species class within the boundaries of the project and whose activities are conducted pursuant to an approved timber harvest plan, nonindustrial timber harvest plan, or working forest management plan. An application for a grant for a project under this paragraph shall include a description of how the proposed project will increase average stem diameter and provide other site-specific improvement to forest complexity, as demonstrated by the expansion of the variety of tree age classes and species persisting for a period of at least 50 years. The department shall also give funding priority to landowners who agree to long-term forest management goals prescribed by the department.(3) For activities on national forest lands to increase tree stand heterogeneity, create forest openings of less than one acre, and increase average tree stand diameter of residual trees. Any grants provided under this paragraph shall be approved by the department, in collaboration with appropriate state agencies, including the State Air Resources Board.(4) For activities that improve ecosystem health on chaparral, shrubland, grassland, and coastal sage scrub lands, including, but not limited to, replacement of ignition-prone nonnative fuels or flashy fuels with heavier and less flammable native vegetation.(5) For regional landscape grants that the director may directly award to regional entities to implement regional priority strategies developed pursuant to Section 4208.1.(d) (1) Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) does not apply to prescribed fire, reforestation, habitat restoration, thinning, or fuel reduction projects, or to related activities included in the project description, undertaken, in whole or in part, on federal lands to reduce the risk of high-severity wildfire that have been reviewed under the federal National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 4321 et seq.) if either of the following is satisfied:(A) The primary role of a state or local agency is providing funding or staffing for those projects.(B) A state or local agency is undertaking those projects pursuant to the federal Good Neighbor Authority (Public Law 113-79) or a stewardship agreement with the federal government entered into pursuant to Public Law 113-79.(2) Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) does not apply to the issuance of a permit or other project approval by a state or local agency for projects described in paragraph (1).(3) This section does not alter, affect, or in any way diminish the authority of a state or local agency to impose mitigation measures or conditions on projects described in paragraph (1) pursuant to other laws or regulations.(4) (A) If the lead agency, as defined in Section 21067, determines that a project is not subject to Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) pursuant to this subdivision and it determines to approve or carry out the project, the lead agency shall file a notice of exemption with the Office of Planning and Research and with the county clerk in the county in which the project will be located in the manner specified in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 21108 or subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 21152. The lead agency shall also post the notice of exemption on its internet website together with a description of where the documents analyzing the environmental impacts of the project under the federal National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 are available for public review.(B) If the lead agency is not the department, the lead agency shall also provide the notice of exemption together with the information set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 4137 to the department. The department shall compile the information submitted to it pursuant to this subparagraph and post the information on the department’s internet website.(5) On or before February 1, 2027, if the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency determines that substantial changes have been made since January 1, 2023, to the federal National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 or other federal laws that affect the management of federal forest lands in California, the secretary shall report those changes to the Legislature in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(6) This subdivision shall become inoperative on January 1, 2028.(e) Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) does not apply to any discretionary approval necessary to carry out or implement projects funded by the Nature-Based Solutions Tribal Program or the tribal cultural burn and tribal wildfire funding authorized by Schedule (2) of Item 3540-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2021, as added by Section 46 of Chapter 240 of the Statutes of 2021. This subdivision only applies to projects carried out on lands subject to the jurisdictional control or the ownership of a California Native American tribe, as defined in Section 21073.(f) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:(1) “Ecosystem” includes forest, chaparral, shrubland, grasslands, and coastal sage ecosystems and natural communities.(2) “Flashy fuels” means shrubs, grasses, and foliage, including, but not limited to, pine needles and leaves, that dry or cure rapidly, ignite easily, and spread fire quickly.(2)(3) “Nonnative flashy fuels” means a nonnative or invasive plant species species, including grasses, mustard, shrubs, and other annual plants, and pine needles and leaves, that dry or cure rapidly, ignite easily, and spread fire quickly, significantly increasing wildfire risk. nonnative or invasive woody plant species.(3)(4) “Regional entities” has the same meaning as defined in Section 4208.SEC. 9. Section 4799.05.1 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:4799.05.1. Before the issuance of regional landscape grants pursuant to Section 4799.05, the director, in collaboration with the Wildfire and Forest Resilience Task Force, shall establish guidelines for funding regional landscape grants pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 4799.05 to contribute to the achievement of the goals of California’s Wildfire and Forest Resilience Action Plan issued in January 2021, and any subsequent updates to that plan developed pursuant to Section 4771. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to the development and adoption of guidelines used for funding these grants.